New Jersey, session 222, S3766.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The New Jersey Board of Nursing, in conjunction with schools of nursing approved by the board, shall establish a Nursing Scribe Program.  Under the program, the board shall authorize schools of nursing approved by the board to grant academic credit to a nursing student enrolled in the school for the successful completion of a nurse scribe course. b.    The board shall promulgate regulations establishing curriculum guidelines for the nurse scribe course.  At a minimum, the course shall: (1) provide training and instruction in electronic medical records documentation and unit workflows; medical terminology; the applicable provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub.L.104-191; and the principles of medical billing, coding, and reimbursement; and (2)   require the student to complete practicum hours, in an amount determined appropriate by the board, providing nurse scribe services. c.     As used in this act: Board means the New Jersey Board of Nursing. Nurse scribe services means the provision of documentation assistance provided to a nurse licensed by the New Jersey Board of Nursing regarding a patient's encounter with the nurse that is consistent with the scope of the nurses licensure. 2.    The New Jersey Board of Nursing shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to carry out the purposes of this act. 3.    The act shall take effect immediately.